Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.10.305

Acquisition, construction, equipping and betterment of lands, buildings and facilities at universities and The Evergreen State College—Use of lands, buildings, and facilities.

The lands, buildings, facilities, and equipment acquired, constructed or installed for those purposes shall be used in the respective institutions primarily for:

(1) Dormitories

(2) Hospitals

(3) Infirmaries

(4) Dining halls

(5) Student activities

(6) Services of every kind for students, including, but not limited to housing, employment, registration, financial aid, counseling, testing and offices of the dean of students

(7) Vehicular parking

(8) Student, faculty and employee housing and boarding.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.10.305. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 107 s 2; 1963 c 167 s 2; 1961 c 229 s 3; prior: 1950 ex.s. c 17 s 1, part; 1947 c 64 s 1, part; 1933 ex.s. c 23 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 91 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 4543-1, part. Formerly RCW 28.76.190.]